Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1294DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1294DP (3) 91
cm/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 22.3, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The examination and copying of public records shall
be done under the supervision of the lawful custodian of the
records or the custodian’s authorized designee. The lawful
custodian shall not require the physical presence of a person
requesting or receiving a copy of a public record and shall
fulfill requests for a copy of a public record received in
writing, by telephone, or by electronic means. Although
fulfillment of a request for a copy of a public record may be
contingent upon receipt of payment of reasonable expenses, the
lawful custodian shall make every reasonable effort to provide
the public record requested at no cost other than copying costs
for a record which takes less than thirty minutes to produce.
In the event expenses are necessary, such expenses shall be
reasonable and communicated to the requester upon receipt of
the request in accordance with section 22.4, subsection 3.
A person may contest the reasonableness of the custodian’s
expenses as provided for in this chapter. The lawful
custodian may adopt and enforce reasonable rules regarding the
examination and copying of the records and the protection of
the records against damage or disorganization. The lawful
custodian shall provide a suitable place for the examination
and copying of the records, but if it is impracticable to do
the examination and copying of the records in the office of
the lawful custodian, the person desiring to examine or copy
shall pay any necessary expenses of providing a place for the
examination and copying.
Sec. 2. Section 22.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3. Upon receipt of a request for a copy of
a public record, the lawful custodian or the lawful custodian’s
authorized designee shall do all of the fo11owing:
a. Promptly acknowledge the request and provide contact
information for the lawful custodian’s authorized designee.
LSB 1294DP (3) 91
-1- cm/ns 1/2

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
For purposes of this paragraph, “promptly” means performing
the action using reasonable, good-faith efforts to respond,
taking into account the circumstances at the time the request
was received.
b. Provide an approximate date by which an estimate for any
reasonable expenses and the release of a copy of the public
record or a response to the request will be provided to the
requester.
c. Inform the requester of any expected delay in the
production of the public record.